Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-917
Surplus and excess property program; employees of Department of Roads; transferred to Department of Correctional Services; conditions; benefits.

All employees employed in those federal surplus and excess property programs which are consolidated by Public Law 94-519 and have been transferred to the Department of Roads may be transferred to the Department of Correctional Services. All employees so transferred shall be: (1) Employed under and compensated through the State Personnel System; and (2) considered as new employees solely for purposes of performance evaluation and subject to all applicable policies and procedures for such transfer. All employees so transferred shall keep all accrued benefits such as sick leave, vacation leave, and retirement benefits after such transfer has been completed.

Laws 1977, LB 548, § 11;

Laws 1981, LB 536, § 5;

Laws 1982, LB 767, § 5.